Illinois, session 104th, HB33.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 5amended by changing Section 3.1 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 65/3.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-3.1)7    Sec. 3.1. Firearm Transfer Inquiry Program. 8    (a) The Illinois State Police shall provide a dial up 9telephone system or utilize other existing technology which 10shall be used by any federally licensed firearm dealer, gun 11show promoter, or gun show vendor who is to transfer a firearm, 12stun gun, or taser under the provisions of this Act. The 13Illinois State Police may charge utilize existing technology 14which allows the caller to be charged a fee not to exceed $10 15and any applicable processing fees. The processing fees shall 16be limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 17electronic online payment system $2. Fees collected by the 18Illinois State Police shall be deposited in the State Police 19Firearm Services Fund and used to provide the service; $4 from 20each fee collected under this subsection (a) shall be 21deposited into the State Police Revocation Enforcement Fund. 22    (b) Upon receiving a request from a federally licensed 23firearm dealer, gun show promoter, or gun show vendor, the   HB0033- 2 -LRB104 03556 RLC 13580 b1Illinois State Police shall immediately approve or, within the 2time period established by Section 24-3 of the Criminal Code 3of 2012 regarding the delivery of firearms, stun guns, and 4tasers, notify the inquiring dealer, gun show promoter, or gun 5show vendor of any objection that would disqualify the 6transferee from acquiring or possessing a firearm, stun gun, 7or taser. In conducting the inquiry, the Illinois State Police 8shall initiate and complete an automated search of its 9criminal history record information files and those of the 10Federal Bureau of Investigation, including the National 11Instant Criminal Background Check System, and of the files of 12the Department of Human Services relating to mental health and 13developmental disabilities to obtain any felony conviction or 14patient hospitalization information which would disqualify a 15person from obtaining or require revocation of a currently 16valid Firearm Owner's Identification Card.17    (b-5) By January 1, 2023, the Illinois State Police shall 18by rule provide a process for the automatic renewal of the 19Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a person at the time of 20an inquiry in subsection (b). Persons eligible for this 21process must have a set of fingerprints on file with their 22applications under either subsection (a-25) of Section 4 or 23the Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 24    (c) If receipt of a firearm would not violate Section 24-3 25of the Criminal Code of 2012, federal law, or this Act, the 26Illinois State Police shall:  HB0033- 3 -LRB104 03556 RLC 13580 b1        (1) assign a unique identification number to the 2    transfer; and3        (2) provide the licensee, gun show promoter, or gun 4    show vendor with the number.5    (d) Approvals issued by the Illinois State Police for the 6purchase of a firearm are valid for 30 days from the date of 7issue. 8    (e) (1) The Illinois State Police must act as the Illinois 9Point of Contact for the National Instant Criminal Background 10Check System.11    (2) The Illinois State Police and the Department of Human 12Services shall, in accordance with State and federal law 13regarding confidentiality, enter into a memorandum of 14understanding with the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the 15purpose of implementing the National Instant Criminal 16Background Check System in the State. The Illinois State 17Police shall report the name, date of birth, and physical 18description of any person prohibited from possessing a firearm 19pursuant to the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or 18 20U.S.C. 922(g) and (n) to the National Instant Criminal 21Background Check System Index, Denied Persons Files. 22    (3) The Illinois State Police shall provide notice of the 23disqualification of a person under subsection (b) of this 24Section or the revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 25Identification Card under Section 8 or Section 8.2 of this 26Act, and the reason for the disqualification or revocation, to   HB0033- 4 -LRB104 03556 RLC 13580 b1all law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction to assist with 2the seizure of the person's Firearm Owner's Identification 3Card. 4    (f) The Illinois State Police shall adopt rules not 5inconsistent with this Section to implement this system.6(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)